tests/йӗп.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах йӗп":
    йӗп<n><nom> :  йӗп 
    йӗп<n><gen> :  йӗппӗн 
    йӗп<n><dat> :  йӗппе 
    йӗп<n><loc> :  йӗпре 
    йӗп<n><abl> :  йӗпрен  
    йӗп<n><ins> :  йӗппе 
    йӗп<n><abe> :  йӗпсӗр 
    йӗп<n><ben> :  йӗпшӗн
    йӗп<n><px1sg><nom> :  йӗппӗм 
    йӗп<n><px1sg><gen> :  йӗппӗмӗн 
    йӗп<n><px1sg><dat> :  йӗппӗме 
    йӗп<n><px1sg><loc> :  йӗппӗмре 
    йӗп<n><px1sg><abl> :  йӗппӗмрен 
    йӗп<n><px1sg><ins> :  йӗппӗмпе 
    йӗп<n><px1sg><abe> :  йӗппӗмсӗр 
    йӗп<n><px1sg><ben> :  йӗппӗмшӗн
    йӗп<n><px2sg><nom> :  йӗппӳ 
    йӗп<n><px2sg><gen> :  йӗппӳн 
    йӗп<n><px2sg><dat> :  йӗппӳне 
    йӗп<n><px2sg><loc> :  йӗппӳнте 
    йӗп<n><px2sg><abl> :  йӗппӳнтен 
    йӗп<n><px2sg><ins> :  йӗппӳпе 
    йӗп<n><px2sg><abe> :  йӗппӳсӗр 
    йӗп<n><px2sg><ben> :  йӗппӳшӗн
    йӗп<n><px3sp><nom> :  йӗппи 
    йӗп<n><px3sp><gen> :  йӗппин 
    йӗп<n><px3sp><dat> :  йӗппине 
    йӗп<n><px3sp><loc> :  йӗппинче 
    йӗп<n><px3sp><abl> :  йӗппинчен 
    йӗп<n><px3sp><ins> :  йӗппипе 
    йӗп<n><px3sp><abe> :  йӗпписӗр 
    йӗп<n><px3sp><ben> :  йӗппишӗн
    йӗп<n><px1pl><nom> :  йӗппӗмӗр 
    йӗп<n><px1pl><gen> :  йӗппӗмӗрӗн 
    йӗп<n><px1pl><dat> :  йӗппӗмӗре 
    йӗп<n><px1pl><loc> :  йӗппӗмӗрте 
    йӗп<n><px1pl><abl> :  йӗппӗмӗртен 
    йӗп<n><px1pl><ins> :  йӗппӗмӗрпе 
    йӗп<n><px1pl><abe> :  йӗппӗмӗрсӗр 
    йӗп<n><px1pl><ben> :  йӗппӗмӗршӗн
    йӗп<n><px2pl><nom> :  йӗппӗр 
    йӗп<n><px2pl><gen> :  йӗппӗрӗн 
    йӗп<n><px2pl><dat> :  йӗппӗре 
    йӗп<n><px2pl><loc> :  йӗппӗрте 
    йӗп<n><px2pl><abl> :  йӗппӗртен 
    йӗп<n><px2pl><ins> :  йӗппӗрпе 
    йӗп<n><px2pl><abe> :  йӗппӗрсӗр 
    йӗп<n><px2pl><ben> :  йӗппӗршӗн
    йӗп<n><pl><nom> :  йӗпсем 
    йӗп<n><pl><gen> :  йӗпсен 
    йӗп<n><pl><dat> :  йӗпсене 
    йӗп<n><pl><loc> :  йӗпсенче 
    йӗп<n><pl><abl> :  йӗпсенчен 
    йӗп<n><pl><ins> :  йӗпсемпе 
    йӗп<n><pl><abe> :  йӗпсемсӗр 
    йӗп<n><pl><ben> :  йӗпсемшӗн
    йӗп<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  йӗппӗмсем 
    йӗп<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  йӗппӗмсен 
    йӗп<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  йӗппӗмсене 
    йӗп<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  йӗппӗмсенче 
    йӗп<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  йӗппӗмсенчен 
    йӗп<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  йӗппӗмсемпе 
    йӗп<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  йӗппӗмсемсӗр 
    йӗп<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  йӗппӗмсемшӗн
    йӗп<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  йӗппӳсем 
    йӗп<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  йӗппӳсен 
    йӗп<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  йӗппӳсене 
    йӗп<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  йӗппӳсенче 
    йӗп<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  йӗппӳсенчен 
    йӗп<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  йӗппӳсемпе 
    йӗп<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  йӗппӳсемсӗр 
    йӗп<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  йӗппӳсемшӗн
    йӗп<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  йӗпписем 
    йӗп<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  йӗпписен 
    йӗп<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  йӗпписене 
    йӗп<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  йӗпписенче 
    йӗп<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  йӗпписенчен 
    йӗп<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  йӗпписемпе 
    йӗп<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  йӗпписемсӗр 
    йӗп<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  йӗпписемшӗн
    йӗп<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  йӗппӗмӗрсем 
    йӗп<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  йӗппӗмӗрсен 
    йӗп<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  йӗппӗмӗрсене 
    йӗп<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  йӗппӗмӗрсенче 
    йӗп<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  йӗппӗмӗрсенчен 
    йӗп<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  йӗппӗмӗрсемпе 
    йӗп<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  йӗппӗмӗрсемсӗр 
    йӗп<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  йӗппӗмӗрсемшӗн
    йӗп<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  йӗппӗрсем 
    йӗп<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  йӗппӗрсен 
    йӗп<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  йӗппӗрсене 
    йӗп<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  йӗппӗрсенче 
    йӗп<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  йӗппӗрсенчен 
    йӗп<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  йӗппӗрсемпе 
    йӗп<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  йӗппӗрсемсӗр 
    йӗп<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  йӗппӗрсемшӗн
